Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 2 STATE BOARD OF CORRECTION
§ 20-242A. Inmate incentive pay.

The board of correction is hereby authorized to institute an incentive pay program for those inmates performing work at the direction of the board of correction in jobs not associated with correctional industry employment.

Such compensation, if any, shall be in accordance with a graduated schedule based on quantity and quality of work performed and skill required for its performance.

Nothing in this section is intended to restore, in whole or in part, the civil rights of any inmate. No inmate compensated under this section shall be considered an employee of the state or the board of correction, nor shall any inmate be eligible for worker’s compensation under title 72, Idaho Code, or be entitled to any benefits thereunder whether on behalf of himself or any other person.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-242A, as added by 1970, ch. 16, § 1, p. 31; am. 1972, ch. 234, § 1, p. 615; am. 2015, ch. 111, § 1, p. 279.

§ 20-243. Delivery of convicted person to penitentiary or board — Copy of commitment — Receipt for delivery of prisoner.

When any convicted person is delivered to the penitentiary or to the custody of the board of correction, the officer having the prisoner in charge shall deliver to the state board of correction or such official, as the board may designate:

A certified copy of the commitment received by such officer from the clerk of the court where the convicted person was tried, and such certified copy of the commitment shall be evidence of the fact therein contained;

A copy or summary of such medical records of the prisoner as may have been prepared or received by the agency or institution from whose custody the prisoner is being delivered, including at least a written report of any suicide attempts, abnormal behavior, seizures or other significant facts affecting the prisoner’s medical condition which were observed during his confinement prior to the delivery;

All unused portions of medications prescribed to the prisoner while in custody and any legitimate prescription medication in the prisoner’s possession when taken into custody;

and shall take from such official a certificate of the delivery of such convicted person.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 43, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 14, p. 425; am. 1982, ch. 98, § 1, p. 277.

§ 20-244. Government and discipline of the correctional facility — Rules and regulations.

The state board of correction shall make and adopt such rules and regulations for the government and discipline of the correctional facility as they may consider expedient, and from time to time, change and amend the same as circumstances may require. A printed copy of the rules and regulations shall be furnished to every officer and guard at the time he is appointed, and so much thereof as relates to the duties and obligations of the convicted persons shall be given to the convicted person upon reception at the state’s correctional institutions.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 44, p. 59; am. 1984, ch. 178, § 1, p. 425.

§ 20-245. Offender labor on state and community service projects.

Offender labor on state projects. The state board of correction shall have the authority to use, under such rules as they may prescribe, the labor of offenders either within or without the walls of the penitentiary and on all public works done under the direct control of the state; that offender labor under control of the state board of correction shall manufacture and repair state highway signs, except for highways and projects where federal regulations would prohibit the use of signs so manufactured; provided, that so far as practicable any manufacture conducted within the walls shall be in connection with metal motor license plates, road or street signs furnished by the state or used by its municipalities, wearing apparel, articles and containers, for state use in the various departments or institutions of the state not for sale upon the open market. When any product produced by the offender shall be used by any department or other institution of the state, the current appropriation shall receive from such department or institution such reimbursement therefor as may be fixed by the state board of correction with the approval of the state board of examiners.

Offender labor on community service projects. The state board of correction shall have the authority to assign parolees under department of correction supervision, probationers under court order or department of correction supervision and offender residents of community work centers under the direction or order of the board of correction, as community service workers as set forth in section 72-102(6), Idaho Code. The state board of correction shall have the authority to charge offenders performing community service work an hourly fee in an amount to be determined by the state insurance fund, to be remitted to the state insurance fund for purposes of providing worker’s compensation insurance for parolees, probationers or community work center residents assigned as community service workers.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 45, p. 59; am. 1957, ch. 207, § 1, p. 434; am. 2004, ch. 149, § 2, p. 479; am. 2006, ch. 206, § 3, p. 627.

§ 20-246. Penitentiary — Powers of board of correction.

All transactions and dealings of the state penitentiary and its properties shall be conducted in the name of the board of correction. The board shall be capable in law of suing in all courts and places in all matters concerning the said penitentiary and is hereby authorized to sue for and recover all sums of money or property due from any person to the people of the state on account of said penitentiary.

History.

1949, ch. 67, § 1, p. 113; am. 1969, ch. 419, § 9, p. 1160.

§ 20-247. Transfer of prisoner to federal penal or correctional institution.

Any person committed to the state penitentiary whose presence may be seriously detrimental to the well-being of the state penitentiary or who wilfully and persistently refuses to obey the rules and regulations of the state penitentiary or who is considered an incorrigible inmate may, upon written certification from the state board of correction, be transferred to a federal penal or correctional institution, provided the attorney general of the United States accepts such application and transfer.

History.

1963, ch. 107, § 1, p. 329.

§ 20-248. Contract for care of transferred prisoner.

The state board of correction is hereby authorized to contract with the attorney general of the United States or such officer as the Congress may designate under the provisions of title 18, section 5003 of the United States Code, and acts supplementary and amendatory thereof, in each individual case for the care, custody, subsistence, education, treatment and training of any prisoner transferred under the provisions of this act. The contract shall provide for the reimbursement of the United States in full for all costs or other expenses to be paid from the appropriation for the operation of the state penitentiary. The state board of corrections shall affix to such contract a copy of the commitment or commitments under which the prisoner is held and the same along with the contract of transfer shall be sufficient authority for the United States to hold said prisoner on behalf of the state of Idaho.

History.

1963, ch. 107, § 2, p. 329.

§ 20-249. Transferred prisoner subject to terms of original sentence.

Any prisoner transferred under this act shall be subject to the terms of his original sentence or sentences as if he were serving the same within the confines of the Idaho state penitentiary. Nothing herein contained shall deprive such prisoner of his rights to parole or his rights to legal process in the courts of this state.

History.

1963, ch. 107, § 3, p. 329.

§ 20-250. Department of correction reporting requirements.

The department of correction shall report to the legislature by February 1 of each year on the amount of savings generated and on the prison population impact under the policy framework of this act for the purpose of tracking the progress toward meeting the impact estimates and goals of the act.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-250, as added by 2014, ch. 150, § 20, p. 414.